North Dakota, session 69, HB1181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 1-01-34 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
1-01-34. Gender - Definition.
1. Words of one gender include the other genders.
2. Words used to reference an individual's gender mean the individual's sex .

H. B. NO. 1181 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1181.
House Vote: Yeas 79 Nays 11 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 6 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State